District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-103

Annual estimates.

Repealed.

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 317, ch. 3446, § 2(h)
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 102, Pub. L. 90-292, § 3(b)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-48, § 2, 32 DCR 4583
Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 116, Pub. L. 104-8, § 202(g)(1)
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1003(b), 54 DCR 4102
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-325, § 2, 56 DCR 499
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4034, 57 DCR 6242
1981 Ed., § 31-103.
1973 Ed., § 31-104.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Public Schools Hearing Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-11, February 25, 2009, 56 DCR 1915).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4034 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Home Rule Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.